Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB871.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3102(g) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended to read:Section 3102. Letting Contracts.--* * *(g) Unless covered under the bonding requirements of the act of December 20, 1967 (P.L.869, No.385), known as the "Public Works Contractors' Bond Law of 1967," the successful bidder shall furnish a bond, or irrevocable letter of credit or other security with suitable reasonable requirements acceptable to the board of supervisors, guaranteeing performance of the contract, in an amount as determined by the supervisors at the time of advertising for bids which shall be not less than ten percent 12345678910111213141516171819 nor more than one hundred percent of the amount of the contract, within twenty days after the contract is awarded. If the bidder fails to furnish the bond or irrevocable letter of credit or other security within twenty days, unless delivery is made or the entire contract is fulfilled during that time, the contract is void. Delivery, accomplishment and guarantees may be required in all cases, including the exceptions contained in this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0871PN0971 - 2 - 12345678910